Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB575.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 140.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In calculating the value of the distributive shares the following deductions and no
others shall be allowed:
(a) Debts of the decedent, except debts secured by property not subject to the tax
jurisdiction of Kentucky,[;] and except debts barred by the statute of
limitations;
(b) Taxes accrued and unpaid, except those on property not subject to the tax
jurisdiction of Kentucky;
(c) Death duties paid to foreign countries;
(d) Federal estate taxes, in the proportion which the net estate in Kentucky
subject to federal estate taxes bears to the total net estate everywhere subject
to federal estate taxes; all calculations are subject to approval by the
Department of Revenue;
(e) Drainage, street, or other special assessments due and unpaid which are a lien
on said property;
(f) Funeral, monument, and cemetery lot maintenance expenses actually paid not
exceeding in total:
1. Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for decedents with a date of death prior
to August 1, 2026; or
2. Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for decedents with a date of death on
or after August 1, 2026;
(g) Commission of executors and administrators in the amount actually allowed
and paid; and
(h) Cost of administration, including attorney's fees actually allowed and paid.
(2) Notwithstanding[ the provisions of] KRS 404.040, the debts of a deceased wife,
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/27/2026 12:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1907
subject to the exception in subsection (1)(a), shall be allowed in calculating the
distributive shares of her estate for purposes of this chapter, provided such debts are
paid from the proceeds of her estate.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/27/2026 12:04 PM Jacketed